Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
352 [OLD]

HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY

REPEALED. L 1980, c 303, §8(1).

CHAPTER
352

HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES

Section

352-1 Definitions

352-2 Repealed

352-2.1 Purpose

352-3 Contracting with private agencies for residential

youth facilities

352-4 Rules and regulations

352-5 Staff standards and training

352-5.5 Criminal history record checks

352-6 Appropriation made out of general revenues

352-7 Records

352-8 Guardianship and custody of the person
committed

352-8.5 Reentry plans; notification

352-9 Period committed

352-10 Circuit court disposition of offenders
under

eighteen years

352-11 Commitments directed, how

352-12 Segregation of committed persons

352-13 Evaluation, counseling, training

352-14 Educational programs provided by the
department

of education

352-15 Recreational and program activities

352-16 Establishment of work release

352-17 Compensation in facilities

352-18 Establishment of trust accounts

352-19 Withdrawals from accounts

352-20 Disposition of inactive accounts

352-21 Youth correctional facilities' benefit
fund;

disposition of income

352-22 Periodic reexamination of status of
persons

committed to the department

352-23 Community services program

352-23.5 Gender-responsive, community-based
programs for

female adjudicated youth

352-24 Juvenile parole program

352-25 Furlough, parole, discharge

352-26 Taking into custody and detaining persons
for

violations of terms and conditions of
parole

and furlough and attempted escape

352-26.1 Public disclosure of information upon
escape

352-27 Harboring or concealing a person away from
custody

assigned by competent authority

352-28 Repealed

352-29 Termination of director's right to
supervise person

352-30 Delegation of responsibilities

352-31 Costs

Note

Juvenile justice oversight advisory council; annual reports;
report to 2016 legislature and executive and judicial branches (repealed last
day of 2016 regular session). L 2014, c 201, §16.

Cross References

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

Transfer of functions, see §352D-4.

Case Notes

As this chapter clearly mandates that youth correctional
facilities be placed under the supervision of the department of human services,
the Hawaii youth correctional facility is a state correctional facility. 113
H. 60, 148 P.3d 493 (2006).

Community correctional center holding unit was not a
"facility". 7 H. App. 247, 753 P.2d 816 (1988).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next